Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 3. Fire Suppression Fund.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fires, §§ 1-4.

36A C.J.S., Fires, §§ 16, 17.

Constitutionality of fire prevention provisions of forest conservation legislation. 13 ALR2d 1129.

Sec. 41.15.200.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of AS

41.15.200

—

41.15.230

is to provide a readily available fund for the payment of expenses incurred by the department in suppressing fires.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1978)

Sec. 41.15.210.
Fire suppression fund.

A fire suppression fund is established in the state treasury for the use of the department. The fund shall be used for actual expenses incurred in the suppression of fires. The fund may not be used

for capital expenditures; or

to fund nonemergency activities of emergency firefighting personnel under AS

41.15.030

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 121 SLA 1996)

Sec. 41.15.220.
Composition of fund.

The legislature may appropriate from the following sources to the fire suppression fund:

money received in settlement of a claim or loss caused by damage as a consequence of a violation of AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

;

money received from federal, state, or other governmental unit, or from a private donor for actual fire suppression work;

money received from other sources as the legislature may consider appropriate and necessary to satisfy the purpose of the fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1978)

Sec. 41.15.230.
Disbursement.

Upon authorization of the governor, disbursements from the fire suppression fund shall be paid by the proper state officer on presentation of vouchers signed by the governor or the governor’s authorized representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1978)

Sec. 41.15.240.
Records of fire suppression fund.

The department shall maintain accounting records showing the income and expenses of the fire suppression fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 126 SLA 1994)